Missouri, session 2026, SB1746.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 115.353, 115.355, 115.357, 115.365,
115.507, 115.511, 115.515, 115.517, 115.531, 115.555, 115.575,
115.603, 115.619, 115.620, 115.621, 476.680, 478.010, 478.320,
and 478.330, RSMo, are repealed and eighteen new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 115.353,
115.355, 115.357, 115.365, 115.507, 115.511, 115.515, 115.517,
115.531, 115.555, 115.575, 115.603, 115.619, 115.620, 115.621,
478.010, 478.320, and 478.330, to read as follows:
115.353. All declarations of candidacy shall be filed
as follows:
(1) For presidential elector, United States senator,
representative in Congress, statewide office, judge of the
supreme court, judge of the court of appeals, circuit judge
[not subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of
the Missouri Constitution], state senator and state
representative, in the office of the secretary of state;
(2) For all county offices which for the purpose of
election procedures shall include associate circuit judges
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1746 2
[not subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of
the Missouri Constitution], in the office of the county
election authority;
(3) For all county offices, in the office of the
county election authority. In any county in which there are
two boards of election commissioners, the county clerk shall
be deemed to be the election authority for purposes of this
section.
115.355. 1. Except as provided in subsections 2 and 5
of this section and in section 115.377, each declaration of
candidacy for nomination in a primary election shall be
filed by the candidate in person in the office of the
appropriate election official.
2. A candidate may file his declaration of candidacy
by certified mail if he is:
(1) Unable to appear in person because of physical
disability, and the declaration is accompanied by a sworn
statement of a licensed physician so stating; or
(2) A member of the Armed Forces of the United States
on active duty, and the declaration is accompanied by a
sworn statement of the candidate's commanding officer so
stating.
3. Except as provided in section 115.377, no election
official shall accept for filing any declaration of
candidacy for nomination in a primary election not presented
to him by the candidate in person or which, if sent by
certified mail pursuant to subsection 2 of this section, is
not accompanied by the statement required in the same
subsection.
4. Election officials shall require proof of identity
of persons when filing declarations of candidacy in person

SB 1746 3
and when filing by mail as provided in subsection 2 or 5 of
this section.
[5. Any judge seeking retention under Sections 25(a)
to 25(g) of Article V of the Missouri Constitution may file
his declaration of candidacy for election to succeed himself
by certified mail.]
115.357. 1. Except as provided in subsections 3 and 4
of this section, each candidate for federal, state or county
office shall, before filing his or her declaration of
candidacy, pay to the treasurer of the state or county
committee of the political party upon whose ticket he or she
seeks nomination a certain sum of money as follows:
(1) To the treasurer of the state central committee,
five hundred dollars if he or she is a candidate for
statewide office or for United States senator, three hundred
dollars if he or she is a candidate for representative in
Congress, judge of the supreme court, judge of the court of
appeals, circuit judge or state senator, and one hundred
fifty dollars if he or she is a candidate for state
representative;
(2) To the treasurer of the county central committee,
one hundred dollars if he or she is a candidate for county
office.
2. The required sum may be submitted by the candidate
to the official accepting his or her declaration of
candidacy, except that a candidate required to file his or
her declaration of candidacy with the secretary of state
shall pay the required sum directly to the treasurer of the
appropriate party committee. All sums submitted to the
official accepting the candidate's declaration of candidacy
shall be forwarded promptly by the official to the treasurer
of the appropriate party committee.

SB 1746 4
3. Any person who cannot pay the fee required to file
as a candidate may have the fee waived by filing a
declaration of inability to pay and a petition with his
declaration of candidacy. Each such declaration shall be in
substantially the following form:
DECLARATION OF INABILITY TO PAY FILING FEE
I, ______, do hereby swear that I am financially
unable to pay the fee of ______ (amount of fee) to
file as a candidate for nomination to the office of
______ at the primary election to be held on the
______ day of ______, 20______.
__________________ Subscribed and sworn
Signature of candidate to before me this
______ day of
______, 20______.
__________________ __________________
Residence address Signature of election
official or officer
authorized to
administer oaths
If the candidate's declaration of candidacy is to be filed
in person, the declaration of inability to pay shall be
subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before the election
official who witnesses the candidate's declaration of
candidacy. If his declaration of candidacy is to be filed
by certified mail pursuant to subsection 2 of section

SB 1746 5
115.355, the declaration of inability to pay shall be
subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before the notary
or other officer who witnesses the candidate's declaration
of candidacy. With his declaration of inability to pay, the
candidate shall submit a petition endorsing his candidacy.
Except for the number of signatures required, each such
petition shall, insofar as practicable, be in the form
provided in sections 115.321 and 115.325. If the person
filing declaration of indigence is to be a candidate for
statewide office, his petition shall be signed by the number
of registered voters in the state equal to at least one-half
of one percent of the total number of votes cast in the
state for the office at the last election in which a
candidate ran for the office. If the person filing a
declaration of indigence is to be a candidate for any other
office, the petition shall be signed by the number of
registered voters in the district or political subdivision
which is equal to at least one percent of the total number
of votes cast for the office at the last election in which a
candidate ran for the office. The candidate's declaration
of inability to pay and the petition shall be filed at the
same time and in the same manner as his declaration of
candidacy is filed. The petition shall be checked and its
sufficiency determined in the same manner as new party and
independent candidate petitions.
4. No filing fee shall be required of any person who
proposes to be an independent candidate, the candidate of a
new party or a candidate for presidential elector.
5. Except as provided in subsections 3 and 4 of this
section, no candidate's name shall be printed on any
official ballot until the required fee has been paid.

SB 1746 6
115.365. 1. The nominating committee authorized to
select a candidate for nomination or election to office
pursuant to section 115.363 shall be one of the following:
(1) To select a candidate for county office, the
nominating committee shall be the county committee of the
party;
(2) To select a candidate for state representative,
the nominating committee shall be the legislative district
committee of the party;
(3) To select a candidate for state senator, the
nominating committee shall be the senatorial district
committee of the party;
(4) To select a candidate for circuit court judge [not
subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the
State Constitution], the nominating committee shall be the
judicial district committee of the party;
(5) To select a candidate for judge of the court of
appeals, the nominating committee shall be the judicial
appellate district committee;
(6) To select a candidate for representative in
Congress, the nominating committee shall be the
congressional district committee of the party;
[(6)] (7) To select a candidate for statewide office,
including judge of the supreme court, the nominating
committee shall be the state committee of the party.
2. After any decennial redistricting, the nominating
committee shall be composed from the new districts, and the
new district lines shall be used in the selection of a
candidate; provided, however, that members of nominating
committees for candidates for special elections to fill
vacancies conducted pursuant to section 21.130 shall be from
the old districts.

SB 1746 7
115.507. 1. Not later than the second Tuesday after
the election, the verification board shall issue a statement
announcing the results of each election held within its
jurisdiction and shall certify the returns to each political
subdivision and special district submitting a candidate or
question at the election. The statement shall include a
categorization of the number of regular and absentee votes
cast in the election, and how those votes were cast;
provided however, that absentee votes shall not be reported
separately where such reporting would disclose how any
single voter cast his or her vote. When absentee votes are
not reported separately the statement shall include the
reason why such reporting did not occur. Nothing in this
section shall be construed to require the election authority
to tabulate absentee ballots by precinct on election night.
2. The verification board shall prepare the returns by
drawing an abstract of the votes cast for each candidate and
on each question submitted to a vote of people in its
jurisdiction by the state and by each political subdivision
and special district at the election. The abstract of votes
drawn by the verification board shall be the official
returns of the election.
3. Any home rule city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county may
by ordinance designate one of the election authorities
situated partially or wholly within that home rule city to
be the verification board that shall certify the returns of
such city submitting a candidate or question at any election
and shall notify each verification board within the city of
that designation by providing each with a copy of such duly
adopted ordinance. Not later than the second Tuesday after
any election in any city making such a designation, each

SB 1746 8
verification board within the city shall certify the returns
of such city submitting a candidate or question at the
election to the election authority so designated by the city
to be its verification board, and such election authority
shall announce the results of the election and certify the
cumulative returns to the city in conformance with
subsections 1 and 2 of this section not later than ten days
thereafter.
4. Not later than the second Tuesday after each
election at which the name of a candidate for nomination or
election to the office of president of the United States,
United States senator, representative in Congress, governor,
lieutenant governor, state senator, state representative,
judge of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals,
judge of the circuit court, secretary of state, attorney
general, state treasurer, or state auditor, or at which an
initiative, referendum, constitutional amendment [or
question of retaining a judge subject to the provisions of
Article V, Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of the State
Constitution], appears on the ballot in a jurisdiction, the
election authority of the jurisdiction shall mail or deliver
to the secretary of state the abstract of the votes given in
its jurisdiction, by polling place or precinct, for each
such office and on each such question. If mailed, the
abstract shall be enclosed in a strong, sealed envelope or
envelopes. On the outside of each envelope shall be
printed: "Returns of election held in the county of ______
(City of St. Louis, Kansas City) on the ______ day of
______, ______,", etc.
115.511. 1. The secretary of state shall convene the
board of state canvassers to total the abstracts of each
primary election and the board shall, not later than two

SB 1746 9
weeks after receiving all required abstracts from the
primary election, issue a statement announcing the results
of the primary election for federal officers, governor,
lieutenant governor, state senators and representatives,
judges of the supreme court, judges of the court of appeals,
circuit judges, secretary of state, attorney general, state
treasurer and state auditor.
2. The secretary of state shall convene the board of
state canvassers to total the abstracts of each general
election and the board shall, not later than the second
Tuesday in December following the general election, issue a
statement announcing the results of the general election for
federal officers, governor, lieutenant governor, state
senators and representatives, judges of the supreme court,
judges of the court of appeals, circuit judges, [appellate
and circuit judges subject to the provisions of Article V,
Section 25 of the State Constitution,] secretary of state,
attorney general, state treasurer and state auditor.
3. The secretary of state shall convene the board of
state canvassers to total the abstracts of each special
election at which the name of a candidate for nomination or
election to the office of United States senator,
representative in Congress, governor, lieutenant governor,
state senator, state representative, judge of the supreme
court, judge of the court of appeals, circuit judge [not
subject to the provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the
State Constitution], secretary of state, attorney general,
state treasurer or state auditor, or at which an initiative,
referendum or constitutional amendment appears on the
ballot, and the board shall, not later than two weeks after
receiving all required abstracts from the election, issue a

SB 1746 10
statement announcing the results of the election for such
office or on such question.
115.515. 1. If two or more persons receive an equal
number of votes for nomination as a party's candidate for
any federal office, governor, lieutenant governor, secretary
of state, attorney general, state treasurer, state auditor,
judge of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals,
circuit judge[ not subject to the provisions of Article V,
Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of the State Constitution], state
senator or state representative, and a higher number of
votes than any other candidate for the same office on the
same party ballot, the governor shall, immediately after the
results of the election have been announced, issue a
proclamation stating the fact and ordering a special primary
election to determine the party's nominee for the office.
The proclamation shall set the date of the election, which
shall be not less than fourteen or more than thirty days
after the proclamation is issued, and shall be sent by the
governor to each election authority responsible for
conducting the special primary election. In the
proclamation, the governor shall specify the name of each
candidate for the office to be voted on at the election, and
the special primary election shall be conducted and the
votes counted as in other primary elections.
2. If two or more persons receive an equal number of
votes for nomination as a party's candidate for any other
office, except party committeeman or committeewoman, and a
higher number of votes than any other candidate for the same
office on the same party ballot, the officer with whom such
candidates filed their declarations of candidacy shall,
immediately after the results of the election have been
certified, issue a proclamation stating the fact and

SB 1746 11
ordering a special primary election to determine the party's
nominee for the office. The proclamation shall set the date
of the election, which shall be not less than fourteen or
more than thirty days after the proclamation is issued, and
shall be sent by the officer to each election authority
responsible for conducting the special primary election. In
the proclamation, the officer shall specify the name of each
candidate for the office to be voted on at the election, and
the special primary election shall be conducted and the
votes counted as in other primary elections.
3. As an alternative to the procedure prescribed in
subsections 1 and 2 of this section, if the candidates who
received an equal number of votes in such election agree to
the procedure prescribed in this subsection, the officer
with whom such candidates filed their declarations of
candidacy may, after notification of the time and place of
such drawing given to each such candidate at least five days
before such drawing, determine the winner of such election
by lot. Any candidate who received an equal number of votes
may decline to have his or her name put into such drawing.
115.517. 1. If two or more persons receive an equal
number of votes for election to the office of governor,
lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state auditor,
state treasurer or attorney general, and a higher number of
votes than any other candidate for the same office, the
secretary of state shall, immediately after the results of
the election have been announced, issue a proclamation
stating the fact, and the general assembly shall, by joint
vote and without delay at its next regular session, choose
one of such persons for the office. The speaker of the
house shall file a certificate declaring which person has
been elected to the office with the secretary of state.

SB 1746 12
2. If two or more persons receive an equal number of
votes for election to federal office, state senator, state
representative, judge of the supreme court, judge of the
court of appeals, or circuit judge [not subject to the
provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the State
Constitution], and a higher number of votes than any other
candidate for the same office, the governor shall,
immediately after the results of the election have been
announced, issue a proclamation stating the fact and
ordering a special election to determine which candidate is
elected to the office. The proclamation shall set the date
of the election and shall be sent by the governor to each
election authority responsible for conducting the special
election. In his proclamation, the governor shall specify
the name of each candidate for the office to be voted on at
the election, and the special election shall be conducted
and the votes counted as in other elections.
3. If two or more persons receive an equal number of
votes for nomination or election to any office not otherwise
provided for in section 115.515 or this section, and a
higher number of votes than any other candidate for
nomination or election to the same office, the officer with
whom such candidates filed their declarations of candidacy
shall, immediately after the results of the election have
been certified, issue a proclamation stating the fact and
ordering a special election to determine which candidate is
elected to the office. The proclamation shall set the date
of the election and shall be sent by the officer to each
election authority responsible for conducting the special
election. In his proclamation, the officer shall specify
the name of each candidate for the office to be voted on at

SB 1746 13
the election, and the special election shall be conducted
and the votes counted as in other elections.
4. As an alternative to the procedure prescribed in
subsections 1, 2, and 3 of this section, if the candidates
who received an equal number of votes in such election agree
to the procedure prescribed in this subsection, the officer
with whom such candidates filed their declarations of
candidacy may, after notification of the time and place of
such drawing given to each such candidate at least five days
before such drawing, determine the winner of such election
by lot. Any candidate who received an equal number of votes
may decline to have his name put into such drawing.
115.531. 1. Not later than five days after the
official announcement of the results of a primary election
is issued by the election authority or the secretary of
state, as the case may be, any candidate desiring to contest
the primary election shall file a verified petition in the
office of the clerk of the circuit court of any circuit in
which part of the election was held and in which any alleged
irregularity occurred, unless the office involved in the
contest is that of a circuit or associate circuit judge [not
subject to Section 25, Article V, Constitution of Missouri],
in which case the verified petition shall be filed, heard,
and determined by an adjoining circuit court selected by the
contestant as specified in section 115.575. The contestant
shall only be required to file one petition with the circuit
court for each election contest regardless of the number of
counties within the court's jurisdiction. The petition
shall set forth the points on which the contestant wishes to
contest the election and the facts the contestant will prove
in support of such points, and shall pray leave to produce
such proof. The judge of the court shall immediately note

SB 1746 14
on the petition the date it was filed and shall immediately
set a date, not later than five days after the petition is
filed, for a preliminary hearing. If the petition is filed
in vacation, the judge of the circuit court shall
immediately convene the court in special session for the
purpose of hearing the contest. If no regular judge of the
court is available the supreme court shall immediately
assign another judge. The circuit court in which the
petition is filed shall have exclusive jurisdiction over all
matters relating to the contest and may issue appropriate
orders to all election authorities in the area in which the
contested election was held.
2. If a petition contesting a primary election is
filed in an incorrect circuit, the court in which it is
filed shall have jurisdiction and shall promptly transfer
the suit to the correct circuit court.
115.555. All contested elections for the office of
governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, attorney
general, state treasurer and state auditor shall be heard
and determined by the supreme court. Likewise, all contests
to the results of elections on constitutional amendments,
and on state statutes submitted or referred to the voters[,
and on questions relating to the retention of appellate and
circuit judges subject to Article V, Section 25 of the State
Constitution] shall be heard and determined by the supreme
court.
115.575. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of this
chapter to the contrary, all contested elections for the
office of judge of the supreme court or of court of appeals,
whether contested on the basis of qualification,
irregularity, or other cause, or for recount other than the
automatic recount provided for in section 115.601, and

SB 1746 15
whether in a primary or general election, shall be filed in
and heard and determined by the supreme court, but no judge
of the supreme court shall sit upon the hearing of any case
in which he or she is a party.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to
the contrary, all contested elections for the office of
circuit or associate circuit judge [not subject to the
provisions of Article V, Section 25 of the State
Constitution], whether contested on the basis of
qualification, irregularity, or other cause, or for recount
other than the automatic recount provided for in section
115.601, and whether in a primary or general election, shall
be filed in and heard and determined by an adjoining circuit
court selected by the contestant.
[2.] 3. All contested elections on any office or
question other than those provided for in sections 115.555,
115.563, and subsection 1 or 2 of this section shall be
heard and determined by the circuit court of any circuit,
selected by the contestant, in which all or any part of the
election was held and in which any alleged irregularity
occurred. The contestant shall only be required to file one
petition with the circuit court for each election contest
regardless of the number of counties within the court's
jurisdiction.
[3.] 4. If a petition contesting any election is filed
in an incorrect circuit, the court in which it is filed
shall have jurisdiction and shall promptly transfer the suit
to the correct circuit court.
115.603. Each established political party shall have a
state committee, a congressional district committee for each
congressional district in the state, a judicial appellate
district committee for each court of appeals district in the

SB 1746 16
state, a judicial district committee for each circuit judge
district in the state [not subject to the provisions of
Article V, Section 25 of the state Constitution], a
senatorial district committee for each senatorial district
in the state, a legislative district committee for each
legislative district in the state and a county committee for
each county in the state, except any city not within a
county which shall have a city committee in lieu of a county
committee.
115.619. 1. A legislative district committee shall
consist of the precinct, ward, or township committeeman and
committeewoman from such precincts, wards, or townships
included in whole or in part of the legislative district.
There shall be elected from the membership of each
legislative district committee a chairman and a vice
chairman, one of whom shall be a woman and one of whom shall
be a man, and each legislative district at the same time
shall elect a secretary and a treasurer, one of whom shall
be a woman and one of whom shall be a man, but who may or
may not be members of the legislative district committee.
Party state committees may provide for voting by proxy and
for weighted or fractional voting.
2. The congressional, senatorial, judicial appellate,
or judicial committee of a district which is composed of:
(1) One or more whole counties; or
(2) One or more whole counties and part of one or more
counties;
shall consist of the county committee chair and vice chair
of each county within the district and the committeeman and
committeewoman of each legislative district committee within
the district.

SB 1746 17
3. The congressional, senatorial, judicial appellate,
or judicial committee of a district which consists of:
(1) Parts of one or more counties;
(2) Part of a city not within the county;
(3) A whole city not within a county; or
(4) Part of a city not within a county and parts of
one or more counties;
shall consist of the committeemen and committeewomen of the
precinct, ward, or township included in whole or in part of
the district and the chair and vice chair of each
legislative district committee within the district in whole
or in part.
115.620. Provisions for proxy voting for district
committees organized under section 115.621 may be made by a
political party. In the event that such provisions are not
made, proxy voting shall only be allowed for legislative,
congressional, senatorial, judicial appellate, and judicial
district committee meetings. In any event, a person may
only serve as a proxy voter if such person is legally
permitted to vote in the district in which the proxy resides.
115.621. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
this section to the contrary, any legislative, senatorial,
judicial appellate, or judicial district committee that is
wholly contained within a county or a city not within a
county may choose to meet on the same day as the respective
county or city committee. All other committees shall meet
as otherwise prescribed in this section.
2. The members of each county committee shall meet at
the county seat not earlier than two weeks after each
primary election but in no event later than the third
Saturday after each primary election, at the discretion of

SB 1746 18
the chairman at the committee. In each city not within a
county, the city committee shall meet on the same day at the
city hall. In all counties of the first, second, and third
classification, the county courthouse shall be made
available for such meetings and any other county political
party meeting at no charge to the party committees. In all
cities not within a county, the city hall shall be made
available for such meetings and any other city political
party meeting at no charge to the party committees. At the
meeting, each committee shall organize by electing two of
its members, a man and a woman, as chair and vice chair, and
a man and a woman who may or may not be members of the
committee as secretary and treasurer.
3. The members of each congressional district
committee shall meet at some place and time within the
district, to be designated by the current chair of the
committee, not earlier than five weeks after each primary
election but in no event later than the sixth Saturday after
each primary election. The county courthouse in counties of
the first, second and third classification in which the
meeting is to take place, as designated by the chair, shall
be made available for such meeting and any other
congressional district political party committee meeting at
no charge to the committee. At the meeting, the committee
shall organize by electing one of its members as chair and
one of its members as vice chair, one of whom shall be a
woman and one of whom shall be a man, and a secretary and a
treasurer, one of whom shall be a woman and one of whom
shall be a man, who may or may not be members of the
committee.
4. The members of each legislative district committee
shall meet at some place and date within the legislative

SB 1746 19
district or within one of the counties in which the
legislative district exists, to be designated by the current
chair of the committee, not earlier than three weeks after
each primary election but in no event later than the fourth
Saturday after each primary election. The county courthouse
in counties of the first, second and third classification in
which the meeting is to take place, as designated by the
chair, shall be made available for such meeting and any
other legislative district political party committee meeting
at no charge to the committee. At the meeting, the
committee shall organize by electing two of its members, a
man and a woman, as chair and vice chair, and a man and a
woman who may or may not be members of the committee as
secretary and treasurer.
5. The members of each senatorial district committee
shall meet at some place and date within the district, to be
designated by the current chair of the committee, if there
is one, and if not, by the chair of the congressional
district in which the senatorial district is principally
located, not earlier than four weeks after each primary
election but in no event later than the fifth Saturday after
each primary election. The county courthouse in counties of
the first, second and third classification in which the
meeting is to take place, as so designated pursuant to this
subsection, shall be made available for such meeting and any
other senatorial district political party committee meeting
at no charge to the committee. At the meeting, the
committee shall organize by electing one of its members as
chair and one of its members as vice chair, one of whom
shall be a woman and one of whom shall be a man, and a
secretary and a treasurer, one of whom shall be a woman and

SB 1746 20
one of whom shall be a man, who may or may not be members of
the committee.
6. The members of each senatorial district shall also
meet at some place within the district, to be designated by
the current chair of the committee, if there is one, and if
not, by the chair of the congressional district in which the
senatorial district is principally located, on the Saturday
after each general election or concurrently with the
election of senatorial officers, if designated or not
objected to by the chair of the congressional district where
the senatorial district is principally located. At the
meeting, the committee shall proceed to elect two registered
voters of the district, one man and one woman, as members of
the party's state committee.
7. The members of each judicial appellate district may
meet at some place and date within the judicial appellate
district or within one of the counties in which the judicial
appellate district exists, to be designated by the current
chair of the committee or the chair of the congressional
district committee, not earlier than six weeks after each
primary election but in no event later than the seventh
Saturday after each primary election. The county courthouse
in counties of the first, second, and third classification
in which the meeting is to take place, as so designated
pursuant to this subsection, shall be made available for
100 such meeting and any other judicial appellate district
101 political party committee meeting at no charge to the
102 committee. At the meeting, the committee shall organize by
103 electing two of its members, a man and a woman, as chair and
104 vice chair, and a man and a woman who may or may not be
105 members of the committee as secretary and treasurer.

SB 1746 21
106 8. The members of each judicial district may meet at
107 some place and date within the judicial district or within
108 one of the counties in which the judicial district exists,
109 to be designated by the current chair of the committee or
110 the chair of the congressional district committee, not
111 earlier than six weeks after each primary election but in no
112 event later than the seventh Saturday after each primary
113 election. The county courthouse in counties of the first,
114 second and third classification in which the meeting is to
115 take place, as so designated pursuant to this subsection,
116 shall be made available for such meeting and any other
117 judicial district political party committee meeting at no
118 charge to the committee. At the meeting, the committee
119 shall organize by electing two of its members, a man and a
120 woman, as chair and vice chair, and a man and a woman who
121 may or may not be members of the committee as secretary and
122 treasurer.
478.010. 1. [Except as provided in Section 25 of
Article V of the Constitution of Missouri,] The circuit
judges of the various judicial circuits shall be elected at
the general elections as herein provided and at the general
election every six years thereafter, and shall enter upon
the duties of their office on the first day in January next
following their election; provided, however, that any terms
commencing in 1981 and 1983 shall commence on the first
Monday in January.
2. The circuit judge of judicial circuit number one
shall be elected in 1980.
3. The circuit judge of judicial circuit number thirty-
six shall be elected in 1984.

SB 1746 22
4. The circuit judges of the remaining judicial
circuits, except those covered by sections 478.370 through
478.715, shall be elected in 1982.
478.320. 1. In counties having a population of thirty
thousand or less, there shall be one associate circuit
judge. In counties having a population of more than thirty
thousand and less than one hundred thousand, there shall be
two associate circuit judges. In counties having a
population of one hundred thousand or more, there shall be
three associate circuit judges and one additional associate
circuit judge for each additional one hundred thousand
inhabitants.
2. For purposes of this section, notwithstanding the
provisions of section 1.100, population of a county shall be
determined on the basis of the last previous decennial
census of the United States; and, beginning after
certification of the year 2000 decennial census, on the
basis of annual population estimates prepared by the United
States Bureau of the Census, provided that the number of
associate circuit judge positions in a county shall be
adjusted only after population estimates for three
consecutive years indicate population change in the county
to a level provided by subsection 1 of this section.
3. [Except in circuits where associate circuit judges
are selected under the provisions of Sections 25(a) to (g)
of Article V of the constitution,] The election of associate
circuit judges shall in all respects be conducted as other
elections and the returns made as for other officers.
4. [In counties not subject to Sections 25(a) to (g)
of Article V of the constitution,] Associate circuit judges
shall be elected by the county at large.

SB 1746 23
5. No associate circuit judge shall practice law, or
do a law business, nor shall he or she accept, during his or
her term of office, any public appointment for which he or
she receives compensation for his or her services.
6. No person shall be elected as an associate circuit
judge unless he or she has resided in the county for which
he or she is to be elected at least one year prior to the
date of his or her election; provided that, a person who is
appointed by the governor to fill a vacancy may file for
election and be elected notwithstanding the provisions of
this subsection.
478.330. 1. When an annual judicial performance
report submitted pursuant to section 477.405 indicates for
three consecutive calendar years the need for two or more
full-time judicial positions in any judicial circuit there
shall be one additional circuit judge position authorized in
such circuit, subject to an initial appropriation made for
that purpose. The clerk of the supreme court shall notify
the Missouri revisor of statutes of any new circuit
judgeships authorized under this section, and the Missouri
revisor of statutes shall publish a footnote to this section
listing the authorized judgeships and corresponding judicial
circuits.
2. [Except in circuits where circuit judges are
selected under the provisions of Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of
Article V of the Missouri Constitution or] Except as
otherwise provided by law, a circuit judge authorized under
subsection 1 of this section shall be elected at the next
general election after the authorization, and every six
years thereafter. Such judicial position shall not be
considered vacant or filled by appointment until January
first next following the authorization. [Except in circuits

SB 1746 24
where circuit judges are selected under the provisions of
Sections 25(a) to 25(g) of Article V of the Missouri
Constitution,] The election of circuit judges authorized by
this section shall be conducted in accordance with chapter
115.
[476.680. 1. The votes on the question
shall be counted, canvassed and returned by the
regular boards of judges, clerks and officers as
votes for candidates are counted, canvassed and
returned, and the abstract made by the officials
in general charge of elections in each such
county shall be returned to the secretary of
state on separate abstract sheets, in the manner
provided for abstract of votes for state and
county officers.
2. The secretary of state, in the presence
of the governor, sixty days after the election,
shall proceed to canvass the votes on the
question; and the governor shall forthwith issue
his proclamation, giving the whole number of
votes cast in each such judicial circuit for and
against the question, and if the question is
approved by a majority of those voting thereon,
declaring the nonpartisan selection of the
circuit and associate circuit judges to be in
full force and effect in each such judicial
circuit as provided for in Article V, Section 29
of the Constitution of 1945.]
Section B. Section A of this act shall become
effective only upon approval by the voters of an amendment
to article V of the Constitution of Missouri that repeals
the nonpartisan selection of judges and establishes the
election of all judges of the supreme court and of the court
of appeals, and of the circuit courts, and associate judges.
✓